test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pundar28_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pundar: # Noun (28) pundar 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     pundar+N+Sg+Nom: pundar
     pundar+N+Sg+Gen: pundrõ
     pundar+N+Sg+Par: pundard
     pundar+N+Sg+Ill: [pundrõhe, pundrõdõ]
     pundar+N+Sg+Ine: [pundrõn, pundrõh, pundrõhn]
     pundar+N+Sg+Ela: pundrõst
     pundar+N+Sg+All: pundrõlõ
     pundar+N+Sg+Ade: pundrõl
     pundar+N+Sg+Abl: pundrõlt
     pundar+N+Sg+Tra: pundrõs
     pundar+N+Sg+Ter: pundrõniq
     pundar+N+Sg+Abe: pundrõldaq
     pundar+N+Sg+Com: pundrõgaq
     pundar+N+Pl+Nom: pundrõq
     pundar+N+Pl+Gen: [pundridõ, pundriidõ, pundardõ]
     pundar+N+Pl+Par: [pundrit, pundriid]
     pundar+N+Pl+Ill: [pundrihe, pundriihe, pundridõ, pundriidõ, pundardõhe]
     pundar+N+Pl+Ine: [pundrin, pundriin, pundrih, pundriih, pundrihn, pundriihn, pundardõn, pundardõh, pundardõhn]
     pundar+N+Pl+Ela: [pundrist, pundriist, pundardõst]
     pundar+N+Pl+All: [pundrilõ, pundriilõ, pundardõlõ]
     pundar+N+Pl+Ade: [pundril, pundriil, pundardõl]
     pundar+N+Pl+Abl: [pundrilt, pundriilt, pundardõlt]
     pundar+N+Pl+Tra: [pundris, pundriis, pundardõs]
     pundar+N+Pl+Ter: [pundriniq, pundriiniq, pundardõniq]
     pundar+N+Pl+Abe: [pundrildaq, pundriildaq, pundardõldaq]
     pundar+N+Pl+Com: [pundridõgaq, pundriidõgaq, pundardõgaq]
